Louisiana, session 2026, HB1196.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1029(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1029. Requirement for coverage of colorectal cancer screening
* * *
B.(1) As used in this Section, "routine colorectal cancer screening" means
any test or screening provided in accordance with the most recently published
recommendations established by the American Cancer Society or the National
Comprehensive Cancer Network for the ages, family histories, and frequencies
referenced in such recommendations. "Routine colorectal cancer screening" does not
mean services otherwise excluded from coverage because they are deemed by a
health coverage plan to be experimental or investigational.
(2) Any colonoscopy conducted for the purpose of colorectal cancer
screening shall be classified as a screening service, irrespective of whether a polyp
or other tissue is excised during the procedure.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1196 ENROLLED
(3) Any subsequent colonoscopy recommended by a healthcare provider as
a result of findings from a routine colorectal cancer screening shall be considered a
routine colorectal cancer screening if provided in accordance with the
recommendations identified in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.